Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF251.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2558XS (2) 91 dg/ko S.F. 251 Section 1. Section 2C.6, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 2C.6 Deputy ââ assistant for penal agencies assistants . 3 1. The ombudsman shall designate one of the members of 4 the staff as the deputy ombudsman, with authority to act as 5 ombudsman when the ombudsman is absent from the state or 6 becomes disabled. The ombudsman may delegate to members of the 7 staff any of the authority or duties of the office except the 8 duty of formally making recommendations to agencies or reports 9 to the governor or the general assembly. 10 2. The ombudsman shall appoint an assistant who shall be 11 primarily responsible for investigating complaints relating to 12 penal or correctional agencies. 13 3. The ombudsman shall appoint an assistant who shall be 14 primarily responsible for investigating complaints relating 15 to child foster care under chapter 237. The assistant shall 16 have a minimum of ten years of experience as a foster parent, 17 with at least five of the ten years as a foster parent while 18 residing in Iowa. 19 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 2C.12A Direct communication ââ child 20 foster care. 21 The ombudsman shall maintain a process to allow an 22 individual licensee under chapter 237 to directly communicate 23 and file a complaint with the ombudsman assistant under section 24 2C.6, subsection 3. 25 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 237.14B Ombudsman information. 26 All materials relating to child foster care that are made 27 available by the department to the public shall contain 28 information about the ombudsman assistant described in 29 section 2C.6, subsection 3. The information shall provide a 30 description of the ombudsman assistantâs duties and the process 31 for contacting the ombudsman assistant. 32